Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,373,384 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the State Mortuary
and Cemetery Board.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,179,389 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Board of
Naturopathic Medicine.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $627,294
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,188,079 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Board of Medical
Imaging.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $993,337
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the State  Board of Examin-
ers for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,220,478 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the Oregon State
Veterinary Medical Examining Board.
Enrolled House Bill 5022 (HB 5022-A) Page 1
SECTION 7. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House March 12, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 1, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5022 (HB 5022-A) Page 2